Indiana, session 2026, HB1431.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 33-23-16-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.51-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. An individual is eligible to participate in a
problem solving court program only if:
(1) the individual meets all of the eligibility criteria established by
the board under section 12 of this chapter;
(2) the judge of the problem solving court approves the admission
of the individual to the problem solving court program; and
(3) the individual is referred to the problem solving court as a
result of at least one (1) of the following:
(A) A condition of a pretrial diversion program authorized by
statute or authorized by the judge of the problem solving court
and the prosecuting attorney.
(B) The procedure described in section 14 of this chapter.
(C) The procedure described in section 15 of this chapter.
(D) A condition of probation.
(E) A condition of participation in a community corrections
2026 IN 1431—LS 6650/DI 147


program under IC 11-12-1.
(F) A condition of participation in a forensic diversion
program under IC 11-12-3.7.
(G) A condition of a community transition program under
IC 11-10-11.5.
(H) A condition of parole.
(I) An order in a dispositional decree under IC 31-34-20 to
participate in a family dependency drug court if the individual
is a parent, guardian, or another household member of a child
adjudicated a child in need of services.
(J) A condition of an informal adjustment program under
IC 31-37-9.
(K) Involvement in:
(i) a child in need of services proceeding;
(ii) a child support proceeding;
(iii) a mental health commitment; or
(iv) a civil protection proceeding.
(L) A condition of an informal adjustment program under
IC 31-34-8.
(M) A condition of a misdemeanor sentence.
(N) A condition of a program authorized by the:
(i) judge of a problem solving court; and
(ii) department of correction or the county sheriff.
(O) A violation under IC 36-1-31.5-1.
SECTION 2. IC 35-52-36-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. IC 36-1-31.5-1 defines a
crime concerning the unauthorized use of land owned by the state
or a political subdivision to camp, sleep, or use for long term
shelter.
SECTION 3. IC 36-1-31.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 31.5. Prohibition of Street Camping
Sec. 1. (a) A person may not camp, sleep, or use for long term
shelter land owned by the state or a political subdivision, unless the
land has been authorized for that use by law.
(b) If:
(1) a person violates subsection (a); and
(2) the person has not previously violated subsection (a);
the law enforcement officer who discovers the violation shall first
give the person a warning and offer to transport the person to a
2026 IN 1431—LS 6650/DI 147


location authorized by law to receive services or shelter.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection
(a) after:
(1) having first received a warning under subsection (b); and
(2) twenty-four (24) hours have elapsed since the warning was
given under subsection (b);
commits a Class C misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. (a) A political subdivision shall not adopt or enforce any
policy under which the political subdivision prohibits or
discourages the enforcement of any order or ordinance prohibiting
public camping, sleeping, or other obstruction of a sidewalk.
(b) In compliance with subsection (a), a political subdivision
shall not prohibit or discourage a law enforcement officer or
prosecuting attorney who is employed by or otherwise under the
direction or control of the political subdivision from enforcing any
order or ordinance prohibiting public camping, sleeping, or other
obstruction of a sidewalk.
(c) A resident of the political subdivision, an owner of a business
located in the political subdivision, or the attorney general may
bring a civil action in any court with jurisdiction against any
political subdivision to enjoin the political subdivision from
violating this section.
(d) The attorney general may recover reasonable expenses
incurred in any civil action brought under this section, including
court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative costs, witness
fees, and deposition costs.
Sec. 3. This chapter does not prohibit a policy of any political
subdivision that encourages diversion programs or offering of
services in lieu of a citation or arrest.
2026 IN 1431—LS 6650/DI 147